California, session 20252026, AB920.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 65940.3 is added to the Government Code, to read:65940.3. (a) (1) A city or county with a population of 150,000 or more persons shall, no later than January 1, 2028, make a centralized application portal available on its internet website to applicants for housing development projects.(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), the population of a county shall be determined based on the population of persons in the unincorporated areas of the county.(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a city or county subject to this section may make a centralized application portal available on its internet website no later than January 1, 2030, if the legislative body of the city or county, on or before January 1, 2028, does both of the following:(1) Makes a written finding that making a centralized application portal available on its internet website on or before January 1, 2028, would require a substantial increase in permitting fees.(2) Initiates a procurement process to make a centralized application portal available on its internet website. (c) The centralized application portal shall allow for tracking of the status of an application.(d) A city or county shall not be required to provide the status of any permit or inspection required by another local agency, a state agency, or a utility provider.(e) For purposes of this section, both of the following definitions apply:(1) “Centralized application portal” means a website or software that a city or county uses to collect information and materials provided by an applicant that are necessary for the city or county to consider a housing development project.(2) “Housing development project” has the same meaning as that term is defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 65905.5.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that Section 1 of this act adding Section 65940.3 to the Government Code addresses a matter of statewide concern rather than a municipal affair as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution. Therefore, Section 1 of this act applies to all cities, including charter cities.SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because a local agency or school district has the authority to levy service charges, fees, or assessments sufficient to pay for the program or level of service mandated by this act, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code.